Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2316.01
Ticket, defined.

Ticket means the compilation of data received by the center in the notice of excavation and the facility locations provided to the center and which is assigned a unique identifying number.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 6.